dictionaries/sv_SE/sv_SE.dic
,/1
./01
0/01
1/01
2/01
3/01
3G/r
4/01
5/01
6/01
7/01
8/01
9/01
a/Dr
A6/r
ABS/r
ackord/AbBDfsTUvY
ackumulation/ADfHvY
administration/ADfHvY
afton/ADfIsvY
aggression/ADfHvY
aids/rX
akantus/bDG
aktieköp/ABDv
alp/AbDH
AMOLED/r
amortering/ADfGvY
andhämtning/ADvY
ANDT/r
angrepp/ABDfvY
anpassning/ADfGvY
ansvarighet/ADfvY
antiglobalisering/Dv
antracit/AbD
apparat/ADfHsY
Arm/r
arrendator/AEHvXY
art/AbDH
artonde/7
arvode/ACEfFvY
attack/ADfHsY
avdrag/ABDfvY
avfyrning/ADfGvY
avkastning/ADfGvY
avkomst/AbD
avräkning/ADfGvY
avslipning/ADvY
avtryck/ABDfvY
B12/r
B5/r
bakdäck/ABDvY
banderoll/ADfHsvY
bangård/ADfGvY
basbelopp/ABDvY
basker/bEI
BBC1/r
bbq/r
befäl/ABDfvY
behärskning/ADfvY
beredskap/ADfHvY
besatthet/ADHvY
besparing/ADfGvY
besättning/ADfGvY
bet/bDR
betal-TV/r
bibliotek/ABDfvY
bildäck/ABDv
blankning/ADGvY
bleck/AbBD
blekning/ADfGvY
blu-ray/rX
blåklocke/uXZ
boaorm/ADGvY
bog/AbDG
bokstav/ADfvY
bortfall/ABDfvY
boskapshjord/ADGvY
brand/ADfJsY
brom/bD
brott/ABDfvY
brukstid/ADv
bröstvårte/uXzZ
BSE/r
burka/AbEG
busskort/ABDvY
butik/ADfHvY
byggvara/AEGw
bås/bBD
CAD/r
cafébord/ABDv
CBS/r
CDM/r
central/ADfHOPQsY
CGI/r
chef/ADfHvY
chill/bX
Coca-Cola/Ar
CP/r
CSS/r
dab/r
dagsverke/ACEFuv
dagvård/ADGvY
dammråtte/uXZ
damp/b
deklaration/ADfHvY
demolering/ADGvY
depression/ADfHvY
dia/AbDmNP
diagnostisering/ADfGvY
diskussion/ADfHvY
distansritt/ADHv
dj/br
djup/ABDfsY
domvilla/AEGx
DR1/r
dragning/ADfGvY
drift/ADfHsvY
drill/AbDG
drivhjul/ABDv
drottning/ADfGsY
dräkt/ADfHsY
dvd/br
dyk/AbBDO
E18/r
E4/r
E85/r
ebb/AbD
EBO/r
e-bok/ADvX
EES/r
effekt/ADfHsUY
eker/AbEI
elektronrör/ABDvY
elfte/7Ab
EM/r
emission/ADfHvY
enstöring/ADGvY
epitel/AbB
ESF/r
etthundrade/7
exemplar/ABDfsTY
F1/r
fabrikör/ADHvY
falk/AbDG
fattigdom/ADfvY
fe/bEH
felfördelning/ADGvY
femhundrade/7
femte/7A
femtioandra/7
femtiofemte/7
femtiofjärde/7
femtioförsta/7
femtionde/7
femtionionde/7
femtiosjunde/7
femtiosjätte/7
femtiotredje/7
femtiotusende/7
femtioåttonde/7
femtonde/7
femtusende/7
figur/ADfHsY
fil/AbD
finnskog/ADGv
fjortonde/7A
fjärde/7Ab
flit/AbD
flockning/ADvY
flätning/ADfGvY
flöda/ADimNPRY
FNL/r
fondvägg/ADGvY
framtagning/ADfGvY
fredag/ADfGvY
fris/bDH
frånluft/ADv
ful/bOPQ
funktionär/ADfHvY
fyrahundrade/7
fyratusende/7
fyrtioandra/7
fyrtiofemte/7
fyrtiofjärde/7
fyrtioförsta/7
fyrtionde/7
fyrtionionde/7
fyrtiosjunde/7
fyrtiosjätte/7
fyrtiotredje/7
fyrtioåttonde/7
fågel/AEfIsY
fårvallning/ADGvY
fä/AbBEF
förband/ABDfvY
fördjupning/ADfGvY
förebild/ADHvY
företaga/BfTvY
förkalkning/ADfGvY
förmiddag/ADfGvY
förnybarhet/ADv
förråd/ABDfvY
förskott/ABDfvY
först/bORz
första/7
försäkring/ADfGvY
förträning/ADvY
förvisning/ADfGvY
G20/r
gamma/AbC
gardin/ADfHsY
gatflicke/uXZ
gatpojke/AEGu
GATS/r
gatubeläggning/ADGvY
Ghraib/r
GIS/r
Gislaved/Adv
gissel/AbCF
givning/ADfGY
glasögon/ADfsUY
gnu/AbEH
gombåge/AEGu
GPRS/r
granat/ADfHsY
granbarr/ABDvY
gratis/bX
griffeltavle/tXZ
grunda/ABfHmNPTY
grupp/ADfHsY
grymhet/ADHvY
gråt/bD
gräddbulle/AEGuX
guldklocke/uXZ
gummisnodd/ADGvY
gåbord/ABDvx
gödning/ADfGvY
gör/AbQR
Hagaborg/Av
Hampshire/ArX
han/bE
handtag/ABDvY
hastighet/ADfHvY
hbtq/r
hemmalag/ABDvY
henna/bE
HIF/br
hinder/ACfFsUvY
hit/b
hjälp/ADfHsY
holdingbolag/ABDvY
hotell/ABDfsUY
HR/r
hsdpa/r
hundrade/7
hundramp/ADHv
husar/AbDH
HVB/r
hyr/bRu
häftning/ADvY
hälsning/ADfGvY
hän/b
högspänning/ADvY
i7/r
ID/r
identifiering/ADfGvY
Idol/Ab
IMEI/r
inbindning/ADGvY
indelning/ADfGvY
information/ADfHvY
inlastning/ADv
inmatning/ADfGvY
innan/b
inslagning/ADfGvY
instickning/ADGv
institution/ADfHvY
intensitet/ADfvY
iPad/DrX
iPod/Ar
IPU/r
IPv6/r
Isaf/r
isbildning/ADGvY
it/br
ITV2/r
IVF/r
j/Br
jaktvård/ADfv
JC/r
Johanna/u
jordgubbssylt/ADvY
jour/ADfHsY
juverhälsa/AEx
järv/AbDG
k/mr
kabinett/ABDfvY
kaffegök/ADGv
kandidat/ADfHsUY
kap/AbBD
kapplöpning/ADfGvY
kardemummabulle/AEGuX
keton/AbDH
KF/r
Kinnevik/AvX
kladdkake/uXZ
klapp/ADfGsY
klappning/ADfGY
kling/b
kläckning/ADfGvY
knalle/Ab
knapp/ADfGOPsY
knappnål/ADGv
kokning/ADfGvY
koks/bD
kommundel/ADGvY
komponent/ADfHsY
kon/bD
konstverk/ABDfvY
konsultation/ADHvY
Kon-Tiki/r
kortvägg/ADGv
kostym/ADfHsUY
kraft/ADfHsY
Kristinestad/Adv
krom/AbBD
kul/bX
kulturnämnd/ADHvY
kultursida/AEGu
kvittensblock/ABDvY
kyndel/AbE
kägla/AEGt
kökskniv/ADGv
lagning/ADfGvY
lagringsmedium/AEJt
lam/bOPQ
lammgam/ADGv
LAS/r
league/r
legato/AbCEF
Legoland/Av
liberalisering/ADfGvY
lind/AbDG
linlängd/ADHv
livstycke/ACEFu
ljusbåge/AEGu
log/bDGHQ
loppmarknad/ADHvY
lp/b
LSD/r
LVM/r
lår/AbBDG
läs/bR
läsbarhet/ADvY
löpning/ADfGvY
major/AbDEH
mandat/ABDfsY
marginal/ADfHsY
marinering/ADGvY
marodör/ADfHsY
maskin/ADfHsY
matning/ADfGvY
mbl/r
MDMA/r
med/AbDG
medel/)ACfFsY
MI6/r
mikroblogg/ADGvXY
mil/AbDO
mixer/bEI
modellering/ADfGvY
monsun/AbDH
morgon/ADfIsUY
motion/ADHvY
MR/r
MTV3/r
multum/w
munhälsa/AEx
munk/AbDG
mån/bO
mösspåtagning/ADGvY
n/mr
nav/AbBD
navigation/ADfvY
nej/ABDr
niohundrade/7
nionde/7
niotusende/7
nittioandra/7
nittiofemte/7
nittiofjärde/7
nittioförsta/7
nittionde/7
nittionionde/7
nittiosjunde/7
nittiosjätte/7
nittiotredje/7
nittioåttonde/7
nittonde/7
NMT/r
nordan/Ab
Nordmark/Av
novell/ADfHsUY
NRK1/r
nuklid/AbDH
NV/r
nämnd/ADfHsY
näver/AbEI
nödlarm/ABDvY
OEF/r
oljepump/ADfGsvY
OM/r
ommöblering/ADGvY
omsorg/ADfHvY
ond/bOPQR
OS/r
ostan/b
overall/ADfHsY
oxidskikt/ABDvY
P3/r
pang/b
papper/BCDfFvY
PCB/r
penning/ADfGsUY
pepp/AbD
period/ADfHsTY
PHP/r
pinnbröd/ABDv
pistol/ADfHsY
pk/br
placering/8ADfGvY
plasmodium/AJt
PNR/r
polis/bDHUXY
postludium/AJt
PPM/r
prematur/AbDHX
pressträff/ADGvY
presumtionshyra/AEGu
produkt/ADfHsUY
program/ACfFsY
projicering/ADfGvY
prutt/AbDG
PSSA/r
punkt/ADfHsY
purjo/AbE
pälsjacke/uXZ
pärkspel/!ABDv
rastgård/ADfGvY
regel/AEfsY
reglering/ADfGvY
rensbrunn/ADGvY
revolution/ADfHvY
RF/r
rim/AbCF
ringklocke/uXZ
rotfyllning/ADGvY
rulltårte/uXZ
rush/AbDH
rådstuga/AEGw
räkmacke/uXZ
rödspätte/uXZ
rörledning/ADfGvY
Rörvik/Av
s/BOrR
salkyrka/AEx
salvia/AbEG
SAT1/r
schamponering/ADfGvY
seminstation/ADHv
servo/AbE
sexhundrade/7
sextioandra/7
sextiofemte/7
sextiofjärde/7
sextioförsta/7
sextionde/7
sextionionde/7
sextiosjunde/7
sextiosjätte/7
sextiotredje/7
sextioåttonde/7
sextonde/7
sextusende/7
signal/ADfHsUY
sim/AbCrX
sjuhundrade/7
sjunde/7
sjuttioandra/7
sjuttiofemte/7
sjuttiofjärde/7
sjuttioförsta/7
sjuttionde/7
sjuttionionde/7
sjuttiosjunde/7
sjuttiosjätte/7
sjuttiotredje/7
sjuttioåttonde/7
sjuttonde/7
sjutusende/7
sjätte/7
sjövett/ABv
skifta/ABiJLmNPYz
skit/)bDGX
skjutning/ADfGvY
skrift/ADfHsY
skuld/ADfHsY
skuldebrev/ABDvY
skärm/ADfGsY
sköljning/ADfGvY
smal/bOPQ
smekning/ADGvY
smycka/AimNPRY
snöflinge/uXZ
soldat/ADfHsUY
solitär/AbDH
sommarprat/ABvY
spalt/ADfHsY
specifikation/ADfHvY
SPF/r
språk/ABDfsY
spå/AbKMN
spärr/ADfGsY
spökgarn/ABDv
SSRI/r
steg/ABDfGQY
stegarbete/ACuv
sto/AbBEF
strafflöshet/ADv
streck/ABDfsY
ström/AfFIsY
styrning/ADfGvY
stäm/AbN
stämpelklocke/uXZ
stöd/ABDfsY
sugklocke/uXZ
sumpmark/ADHv
svamp/ADfGsY
SVT24/r
svär/Ab
sysselsättning/ADfGvY
system/ABDfsUY
sällskapsrum/ACFvY
särgymnasium/AJt
säsong/ADfHsvY
söt/bOPQ
tablett/ADfHsY
taxering/ADfGvY
Teleborg/Av
tensor/AbEH
tionde/7ACEFY
tiotusende/7
tjugoandra/7
tjugofemte/7
tjugoförsta/7
tjugonionde/7
tjugosjätte/7
tjugotusende/7
tjyv/AbDG
toalettlock/ABDvY
tolfte/7
tolkning/ADfGvY
trehundrade/7
trettiofemte/7
trettioförsta/7
trettionionde/7
trettiosjätte/7
trettioåttonde/7
tretusende/7
TRIPS/r
truppslag/ABDvY
tryck/ABDfsY
träl/AbDG
tv/br
twar/r
tvåhundrade/7
tvärstycke/ACEFu
täcknamn/ABDvY
tätning/ADfGvY
ull/AbD
uppdraga/DfvY
upplåsning/ADfGvY
upplägg/ABDfvY
upptagning/ADfGvY
URL/r
utgjutning/ADfGvY
utläggning/ADGvY
utrymma/ADiJKLORY
utsläpp/ABDfvY
V65/r
vagn/ADfGsvY
van/bEPQy
varsamhet/ADvY
w-cdma/r
verktyg/ABDfvY
veterinär/ADfHOsUY
vevstake/AEGu
vhs/r
vild/DOPxXY
vinn/bOR
vinterbete/ACEFvY
vinterjacke/uXZ
volontär/ADfHsvY
VVS/r
vårda/ADfNPTY
väder/ACfFsY
vänstervridning/ADvY
värde/ACEfFsY
värmepump/ADfGsUvY
zoo/AbBEF
å/bCEGr
åkning/ADfGvY
årsarbete/ACEFu
årsbok/ADvY
åttahundrade/7
åttioandra/7
åttiofjärde/7
åttionde/7
åttiosjunde/7
åttiotredje/7
åttonde/7
äggklocke/uXZ
öde/AbCEFmv
ögonskugge/uUXZ
Önnerud/Av
överfalla/ADfJKLRvY
överkäke/AEGu
ε/r
ν/r
φ/r
